Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2300.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 237.1. Mandatory Reporting and Remittance Oversight Authority.--(a) The department may require a taxpayer to utilize an authorized service provider to report and remit taxes due under this article if the taxpayer has:(1) a delinquent sales tax balance greater than five 123456789101112131415161718192021 thousand dollars ($5,000) and the department has filed a lien for the taxes; or(2) three consecutive non-filed returns.(B) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT REQUIRE A TAXPAYER TO UTILIZE AN AUTHORIZED SERVICE PROVIDER AS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) IF THE TAX LIABILITY IN QUESTION IS CURRENTLY SUBJECT TO APPEAL UNDER ARTICLE XXVII.(b) (C) A taxpayer subject to this section shall use an authorized service provider until the later of the following:(1) one year since the taxpayer's enrollment with the authorized service provider; or(2) six months after all tax delinquencies are reported and paid.(c) (D) A taxpayer subject to this section shall, not later than forty-five SIXTY days after the date of notice from the department under this section, acquire service from an authorized service provider. The department shall post a list of authorized service providers on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. (E) IF THE TAXPAYER RESOLVES AN UNPAID TAX LIABILITY WITHIN THE SIXTY-DAY PERIOD OF TIME UNDER SUBSECTION (D), THE TAXPAYER SHALL NO LONGER BE REQUIRED TO COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.(d) (F) The department may assess a penalty in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) against a taxpayer subject to this section that refuses or fails to timely enroll with an authorized service provider.(e) (G) A taxpayer subject to this section may elect to continue to use the authorized service provider to report and remit the tax under this article after the period under 20260HB2300PN3518 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (b) (C) expires. (f) (H) The department shall pay for the costs of an authorized service provider during the first twelve months of a taxpayer's requirement to use an authorized service provider, and the taxpayer shall pay for the costs for any month after that period. The department shall only pay costs for a taxpayer under this subsection once during the taxpayer's lifetime or existence.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2300PN3518 - 3 - <--<--123456789